Washington statutes.
RCW 18.20.160

Persons requiring medical or nursing care.

No person operating an assisted living facility licensed under this chapter shall admit to or retain in the assisted living facility any aged person requiring nursing or medical care of a type provided by institutions licensed under chapters 18.51, 70.41 or 71.12 RCW, except that when registered nurses are available, and upon a doctor's order that a supervised medication service is needed, it may be provided. Supervised medication services, as defined by the department and consistent with chapters 69.41 and 18.79 RCW, may include an approved program of self-medication or self-directed medication. Such medication service shall be provided only to residents who otherwise meet all requirements for residency in an assisted living facility. No assisted living facility shall admit or retain a person who requires the frequent presence and frequent evaluation of a registered nurse, excluding persons who are receiving hospice care or persons who have a short-term illness that is expected to be resolved within fourteen days.

[ 2012 c 10 s 11; 2004 c 142 s 12; 1985 c 297 s 2; 1975 1st ex.s. c 43 s 1; 1957 c 253 s 16.]

NOTES:

Application—2012 c 10: See note following RCW 18.20.010.

Effective dates—2004 c 142: See note following RCW 18.20.020.